Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES - ORGANIZATION

Editor's note:

This part 1 is similar to article 70 of title 22 as it existed prior to 1975.

23-71-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Local District College Organization Act".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 748, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 71, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local district college" means an educational institution that provides not more than two years of training in the arts, sciences, and humanities beyond the twelfth grade of the public high school curriculum or vocational education and that conducts occupational, technical, and community service programs, with no term limitations, and general education, including college transfer programs, with unrestricted admissions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section:

Colorado mountain college is a dual mission institution, operating as a local district college and offering a limited number of baccalaureate degree programs, as its board of trustees determines appropriate to address the needs of the communities within its service area and as are approved by the Colorado commission on higher education. Colorado mountain college may also offer bachelor of applied science degree programs that are approved by the board of trustees pursuant to section 23-71-134.

Aims community college, in addition to its mission as a local district college, may also offer, as its board of trustees determines appropriate to address the needs of the communities within its service area:

Bachelor of applied science degree programs that are approved by the board of trustees pursuant to section 23-71-134; and

Bachelor of science degree in nursing programs, as a completion degree to students who have or are pursuing an associate degree in nursing or a practical nursing certificate, that are approved by the Colorado commission on higher education pursuant to section 23-1-133 (2).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 748, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 820, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-101), ch. 335, p. 1538, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-004), ch. 13, p. 123, § 8, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

IP, IP(1)(b), and (1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 18-1300), ch. 278, p. 1751, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 19-1153), ch. 80, p. 288, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2507, § 10, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(II)(B) amended, (SB 22-003), ch. 71, p. 368, § 3, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 335, Session Laws of Colorado 2010. For the legislative declaration in SB 14-004, see section 1 of chapter 13, Session Laws of Colorado 2014. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-71-102.5. Local district college - local college district - change in terms - authority of revisor.

The revisor of statutes is authorized to change all references to "local junior college" or "junior college" that appear in the Colorado Revised Statutes to "local district college".

The revisor of statutes is authorized to change all references to "local junior college district" and "junior college district" that appear in the Colorado Revised Statutes to "local college district".

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1259), ch. 123, p. 350, § 6, effective April 21.

23-71-103. Districts organized - when.

Local college districts in Colorado may be organized in an area approved for organization by the state board for community colleges and occupational education. The area to be approved for organization shall also have a twelfth-grade school population, as determined by the immediately preceding school census, of four hundred or more and a valuation for assessment at the time of organization of such district of sixty million dollars or more. A district may be entirely within one county or partly in two or more counties. Any existing school districts shall be entirely included or entirely excluded.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 748, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-104. Petition of electors.

A local college district may be formed upon the petition of five hundred eligible electors residing in the area of the proposed district and having the qualifications prescribed in section 23-71-107. If the petition is for the formation of a local college district consisting of an area within a single county, it must be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county, and, if the petition is for the formation of a local college district situated in two or more counties, the petition must be filed with the secretary of state. Each petition must specify whether the first board of trustees consists of five, seven, nine, or eleven elected members following a successful election to organize the local college district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 749, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 846, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 49, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1259), ch. 123, p. 347, § 1, effective April 21.

23-71-105. Election to organize.

Upon receipt of the petition provided in section 23-71-104, the county clerk and recorder or, in the event the proposed district is situated in two or more counties, the secretary of state shall review the petition to determine whether it contains the number of signatures required for an organizational election. In the event that the petition contains the requisite number of signatures, the county clerk and recorder or secretary of state shall give notice to the school electors residing in the area of the proposed district that at the next regular biennial school election, or at a special election which is requested in the petition, the question of organizing a local college district will be submitted to the eligible electors of the respective school districts located in the area of the proposed local college district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 749, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section R&RE, p. 846, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 50, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-106. Notice to be given - when. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 749, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3) amended, p. 846, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 849, § 51, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-107. Qualifications of voters - conduct of elections.

An eligible elector is an elector who has complied with the registration provisions of article 2 of title 1, C.R.S., and who resides within the jurisdiction of the proposed local college district. All elections authorized under this article shall be conducted pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The county clerk and recorder in each county in which a part of the district is located shall be the designated election official for an organizational election. Thereafter the designated election official shall be the secretary of the board, unless otherwise provided by the board.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 849, § 52, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 749, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 846, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 52, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-108. Certification of returns. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 750, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 846, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 850, § 53, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-109. Record of votes.

If the proposed local college district is situated entirely within one county and a majority of the votes cast on the question of organizing a local college district are in favor of the organization, the district shall be formed in accordance with the provisions of this part 1.

If the proposed local college district is situated in two or more counties, the respective county clerk and recorders, within ten days after the election, shall determine the results from the counties and shall certify the results to the secretary of state who shall survey the results. If a majority of all votes cast in the proposed district are in favor of the organization, the district shall be formed in accordance with the provisions of this part 1.

If it appears that one-half or more of the votes cast are not in favor of the organization, the district shall not be organized; but the provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition for the formation of a similar local college district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 750, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 305, § 39, effective May 20.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 847, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 850, § 54, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-110. Election of board - members and terms.

Each public local college district established under the provisions of this part 1 must have a board of control, known as the board of trustees, consisting of five, seven, nine, or eleven members elected at public elections for staggered terms of four years each. The first board of trustees is elected in the manner provided in section 23-71-111. Thereafter, regular elections of board members are held in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

The regular election of the members of a board of trustees shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in odd-numbered years, as provided by law for regular biennial school elections in school districts. Special elections shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February, May, September, or December.

The board of trustees of each local college district existing on or after July 1, 1984, and before July 1, 1986, shall determine whether the board of trustees consists of five, seven, nine, or eleven members. The board of trustees of each local college district created after July 1, 1986, consists of five, seven, nine, or eleven members as specified in the organization petition; except that the board of trustees may subsequently increase the number of board members as provided in subsection (8) of this section. The board of trustees of each local college district shall determine the number of vacancies existing and the length of term of each vacancy for the next and subsequent regular elections for board members. Except for the election of members who were appointed pursuant to subsection (8) of this section and section 23-71-121, the board of trustees shall ensure that there are no more than three vacancies at any regular election for a five-member board, no more than four vacancies at any regular election for a seven-member board, no more than five vacancies at any regular election for a nine-member board, and no more than six vacancies at any regular election for an eleven-member board and that each board member has a term of four years.

A board of trustees may establish board member districts for its local college district if it determines that such districts are in the best interests of the local college district. Such board member districts shall be established on the basis of nearly equal population or on the basis of geography and population if the local college district consists of more than one county.

Members of a board of trustees shall be elected at the regular biennial school election of school districts within the local college district. Any person desiring to be a candidate for the office of trustee shall file a petition for nomination pursuant to section 1-4-803 and part 9 of article 4 of title 1, C.R.S. The election shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The secretary of the board of trustees shall be the designated election official responsible for the election.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 851, § 55, effective January 1, 1993.)

The cost of the election of members of the board of trustees as provided in this section shall be paid by the local college district in which the elections are conducted, or, in the event of a coordinated election, the costs shall be allocated pursuant to sections 1-5-506 and 1-5-507, C.R.S.

A local college district that has a five-member board of trustees may increase the board membership to seven members at any time by the appointment of two new members. A local college district that has a seven-member board of trustees may increase the board members to nine or eleven members by the appointment of new members if one or more additional school districts is annexed into the local college district as provided in section 23-71-128. Each person appointed pursuant to this subsection (8) must be appointed at least one hundred twenty days prior to the next regular biennial local district college election and may serve as an appointee only until the election and until the appointed person, if he or she seeks election, or his or her successor has been elected and has qualified.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 751, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 646, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) to (3) amended and (8) added, p. 848, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) and (5) to (7) amended, p. 851, § 55, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(7) amended, p. 1437, § 130, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1), (3), and (8) amended, (HB 16-1259), ch. 123, p. 347, § 2, effective April 21.

23-71-111. Election of first board - new district.

In all local college districts organized under the provisions of this part 1 or other applicable statutes on or after July 1, 1984, the first board of trustees must be elected in the following manner:

An election for members of the first board shall be called within sixty days of the successful election to organize the local college district.

At the election, a board consisting of the number of persons specified in the organization petition must be elected so that the first board members serve staggered terms and thereafter their successors in office serve staggered terms of four years.

The county clerk and recorder of each county included in the new local college district shall call and conduct such election in the manner provided in section 23-71-107.

The costs of the election of board members as provided in this section shall be paid by the local college district in which the elections are conducted.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 752, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(d) amended, p. 648, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(b) amended, p. 848, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 852, § 56, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (HB 16-1259), ch. 123, p. 348, § 3, effective April 21.

23-71-112. Precincts and polling places. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 752, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 849, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 852, § 57, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-113. Judges. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 753, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 849, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 853, § 5, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-114. Candidates for board of trustees.

Any person who desires to be a candidate for the local district college board of trustees and who is an eligible elector in the local college district shall file a petition for nomination pursuant to section 1-4-803 and part 9 of article 4 of title 1, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 854, § 59, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-115. Notice of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 850, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 854, § 60, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-116. Ballots, ballot boxes, voting machines, and electronic voting equipment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(2) amended, p. 409, § 10, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 2028, § 29, effective July 14.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 850, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 854, § 61, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-117. Qualification of voters. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 850, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 855, § 62, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-118. Officers.

Within sixty days after the close of polls in an election of any local district college board of trustees, the board shall meet and select from among its members a president, a secretary, and a treasurer, who shall serve until the first meeting of the board following the next election for members of the board.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1365), ch. 333, p. 1484, § 1, effective June 5.

23-71-119. Regular meetings.

The local district college board of trustees shall hold regular meetings as the board decides; except that the board shall hold no fewer than four regular meetings each year. The board may hold additional or special meetings upon call of the president or a majority of the board. The secretary of the board shall notify the members of all meetings. The board shall hold all special and regular meetings of the board at locations that are within the boundaries of the district or that are within the boundaries of a county in which the district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location is not farther than twenty miles from the district boundaries. The board may waive the provisions of this section governing the location of meetings only if the proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board and if the board adopts a resolution stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this section and further stating the date, time, and place of the meeting.

The board of trustees of Colorado mountain college, without holding a meeting, may take an action that is otherwise required or permitted to be taken at a board meeting if:

The secretary of the board transmits in writing to each member of the board notice of the proposed action to be taken without a meeting;

A board member does not demand in writing that the action described in the notice be discussed in a regular or special board meeting;

After the board receives notice of the proposed action, the board secretary provides full and timely notice of the proposed action to the public by posting notice of the proposed action in the designated public place for posting notice of meetings described in section 24-6-402 (2)(c), C.R.S., and a member of the public does not request that the proposed action be discussed in a regular or special board meeting; and

Every member of the board, by the date stated in the notice, delivers a written vote in favor of taking the action.

The notice required by this subsection (2) must, at a minimum, state:

The action to be taken;

The date by which each board member must respond; and

That failure to respond by the date stated in the notice has the same effect as voting against the action stated in the notice.

The board of trustees of Colorado mountain college may take an action without a meeting as provided in this subsection (2) only if, by the date stated in the notice transmitted pursuant to this subsection (2), the board president receives an affirmative vote in favor of the action in writing from each member of the board and does not receive a written demand by a board member that the action not be taken without a meeting. Unless the notice transmitted pursuant to this subsection (2) states a different effective date, an action taken pursuant to this subsection (2) is effective on the date for response stated in the notice transmitted pursuant to this subsection (2).

A writing by a board member under this subsection (2) must, at a minimum, specify the identity of the board member; the vote, abstention, demand, or revocation of the board member; and the proposed action to which the vote, abstention, demand, or revocation relates. Unless otherwise provided by an action of the board, all communications under this subsection (2) may be transmitted or received by electronically transmitted facsimile, electronic mail, or other form of wire or wireless communication. For purposes of this subsection (2), communications are not effective until received.

An action taken pursuant to this subsection (2) has the same effect as an action taken at a regular or special meeting of the board and may be described as such in any document. Electronic mail or other written communications used to provide notice or to discuss the proposed action are subject to the open meeting requirements specified in part 4 of article 6 of title 24, C.R.S.

The board secretary shall ensure that all writings made pursuant to this section are filed with the minutes of the board meetings.

In addition to the list described in section 24-6-402 (7), C.R.S., the board secretary shall maintain a list of persons who ask for notice of a proposed action to be taken pursuant to this subsection (2). The board secretary shall notify each person on the list of a proposed action and shall specify in the notice that a member of the public may request that the board discuss the proposed action in a regular or special board meeting.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1259), ch. 123, p. 349, § 5, effective April 21.

23-71-120. District - body corporate.

Each regularly organized local college district which may be formed as provided in this part 1 is declared to be a body corporate, by the name and style of ".............. Local College District", and in that name may hold property and be a party to suits and contracts, the same as municipal corporations in this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-120.5. Recall of board members.

Any board member may be recalled from office at any time. Any recall shall be initiated and conducted pursuant to part 1 of article 12 of title 1, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 855, § 63, effective January 1, 1993.)

to (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 855, § 63, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1174, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 855, § 63, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-121. Vacancies.

An office of a board member shall be deemed vacant if the person who was duly elected or appointed to the board:

Does not attend three consecutive regular meetings of the board, unless such absence is excused by the board;

Submits a written resignation to the board and such resignation is duly accepted by the board;

Becomes a nonresident of the local college district or board member district from which he was elected; or

Dies during his term of office.

At the next meeting of the board immediately following the occurrence of a vacancy, the board shall adopt a resolution declaring a vacancy in said office and shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy within sixty days after said vacancy has occurred. If the appointment is not made by the board within such sixty-day period, the president of the board shall forthwith appoint a person to fill the vacancy. The appointment shall be evidenced by an appropriate entry in the minutes of the meeting, and the board shall cause a certificate of appointment to be delivered to the person so appointed.

If the vacancy occurs more than ninety days prior to the next regular biennial local district college election and the unexpired term is for more than two years, an appointee to the board shall serve until the next regular biennial local district college election and until the successor for the remainder of the term is elected and has qualified. If the vacancy occurs within the ninety-day period prior to a regular biennial local district college election and the unexpired term is for more than two years, an appointee to an office of the board shall serve until the next succeeding regular biennial local district college election at which a candidate for the board may lawfully be nominated pursuant to section 1-4-803 and part 9 of article 4 of title 1, C.R.S., and until a successor has been elected and has qualified. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (3), an appointee to an office of the board shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(3) amended, p. 409, § 11, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 86:

IP(1), (1)(a) to (1)(c), (2), and (3) amended, p. 851, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(3) amended, p. 857, § 64, effective January 1, 1993.